Florida, session 2026, SB170.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 409.14512, Florida Statutes, is created 16 to read: 17 409.14512âPeopleâs Relief Program.â 18 (1)âThe Peopleâs Relief Program is created within the 19 department. The purpose of the program is to provide residents 20 of this state who are experiencing economic hardship with 21 assistance for everyday expenses, such as housing, childcare, 22 and health care. 23 (2)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that this program 24 ensure long-term financial stability for individuals and 25 families who reside in this state by offering grants to assist 26 residents experiencing economic hardship. 27 (3)âSubject to appropriation by the Legislature, the 28 program shall provide assistance in the form of grants to 29 residents experiencing economic hardship. Such grants must be 30 available to residents if any of the following occurs: 31 (a)âUtility costs rise above a specified percentage of 32 average household income. 33 (b)âProperty insurance premiums rise above a specified 34 threshold. 35 (c)âStatewide unemployment rises above a specified 36 percentage. 37 (d)âAn economic decline causes widespread hardship. 38 (e)âA natural disaster leads to the declaration of a state 39 of emergency. 40 (4)âTo be eligible for assistance under the program, an 41 individual must: 42 (a)âHave been a resident of this state for at least 1 year 43 before applying; 44 (b)âProvide evidence of a change in circumstances which 45 hinders or prohibits the individual from being able to fulfill 46 pending financial obligations related to utility, property 47 insurance, childcare, or health care expenses; and 48 (c)âProvide documentation of utility costs, property 49 insurance premiums, childcare expenses, or health care expenses. 50 (5)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 51 section. The rules must, at a minimum, include all of the 52 following: 53 (a)âAn application that must be available on the 54 departmentâs website. 55 (b)âThe specified thresholds for the conditions in 56 paragraphs (3)(a)-(d). 57 (c)âThe procedures for awarding and disbursing the grants. 58 (d)âRestrictions on the use of grant funds. 59 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.